Alabama, session 2026rs, HB225.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 16-22-15, Code of Alabama 1975, is
amended to read as follows:
"§16-22-15
(a) For the purposes of this section, the following
words shall have the following meanings:
(1) BOARD OF EDUCATION or BOARD. All public county and
city boards of education; the Board of Trustees of the Alabama
Institute for Deaf and Blind; the Alabama Youth Services
Department School Board in its capacity as the Board of
Education for the Youth Services School District; the Board of
Directors of the Alabama School of Fine Arts; the Board of
Trustees of the Alabama High School of Mathematics and
Science; and the Board of Trustees of the Alabama Community
College System as applied to two-year postsecondary education
institutions.
(2) EXECUTIVE OFFICER. The superintendent of any public
county or city school system; the President of the Alabama
Institute for Deaf and Blind; the president of any two-year
school or college under the auspices of the State Board of
Page 1

school or college under the auspices of the State Board of
HB225 Enrolled
Education Chancellor of the Alabama Community College System;
the Executive Director of the Alabama School of Fine Arts; the
Superintendent of the Department of Youth Services School
District; and the Executive Director of the Alabama High
School of Mathematics and Science.
(3) EMPLOYEES. Employees or personnel of the board
except for the following:
a. Those employees covered under the Alabama state
Merit System.
b. Those employees of the Alabama Institute for Deaf
and Blind who work for the Alabama Industries for the Blind
and those satellite employees at its regional centers.
(b) Each board of education, through its executive
officer, shall post a notice of vacancy for each vacant
personnel position. The notice shall be posted on the board
website, at a minimum, or in a conspicuous place at each
school campus and worksite, at least seven calendar days
before the position is to be filled. In addition, any person
or organization, upon request, shall receive electronic
notification of personnel vacancies from the executive
officer. The notice shall include, but not necessarily be
limited to, all of the following:
(1) Job description and title.
(2) Required qualifications.
(3) Salary schedule and amount.
(4) Information on where to submit an application.
(5) Information on any deadlines for applying.
(6) Any other relevant information.
Page 2

(6) Any other relevant information.
HB225 Enrolled
(c) If a personnel vacancy occurs during the time when
the schools are in session, the vacancy notice shall be posted
not less than seven calendar days before the position is to be
filled. All vacancies involving jobs which are supervisory,
managerial, or otherwise newly created positions shall
nevertheless also require posting notices of at least 14 seven
calendar days.
(d) The board may adopt or continue policies which are
not inconsistent with this section. The board may adopt
policies to ensure the safety and welfare of its students
during dire emergency situations, but the posting of a vacancy
notice as required in this section shall not be abridged or
delayed except in dire emergency circumstances and then
delayed only temporarily in order to reasonably meet the
conditions of the emergency. The adoption of additional
policies shall comply with the requirements and procedures of
Section 16-1-30 by all boards defined in this section."
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 3

1, 2026.
HB225 Enrolled










________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate


House of Representatives

I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
was passed by the House 27-Jan-26.

100 John Treadwell
101 Clerk
102
103
104
105
106
107 Senate 01-Apr-26 Passed
108
109
110
Page 4